Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3506
Statute of limitations.

(a) An action under subsection (b) of section 25-3503 for:

(1) an unauthorized disclosure may not be brought later than four years from the date the disclosure was discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of reasonable diligence; and

(2) a threat to disclose may not be brought later than four years from the date of the threat to disclose.

(b) This section is subject to section 25-213.

Laws 2019, LB680, § 6.